test/src/gt-norm-yamls/noun-denominal_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against 
# ? = not checked

# Denominal noouns. Lexicon VUOHTA, VUONAK


Tests:
  Noun - narvijkak: # VUONAK
    Narvijkka+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: narvijkak 
    Narvijkka+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Gen: narvijkaga
    Narvijkka+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: narvijkagimme
    Narvijkka+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Acc: narvijkagav
    Narvijkka+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Ine: narvijkagin 
    Narvijkka+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Ill: narvijkagij
    Narvijkka+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Ela: narvijkagis
    Narvijkka+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Com: narvijkagijn
    Narvijkka+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Pl+Nom: narvijkaga
    Narvijkka+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Pl+Gen: narvijkagij
    Narvijkka+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Pl+Acc: narvijkagijt
    Narvijkka+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Pl+Ine: narvijkagijn
    Narvijkka+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Pl+Ill: narvijkagijda
    Narvijkka+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Pl+Ela: narvijkagijs
    Narvijkka+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Pl+Com: narvijkagij
    Narvijkka+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Ess: narvijkagin
    Narvijkka+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: narvijkagasj
    Narvijkka+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: narvijkagattjasj

  Noun - sjievnnjisvuohta: # VUOHTA
    sjævnnjat+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: sjievnnjisvuohta 
    sjævnnjat+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Gen: sjievnnjisvuoda
    sjævnnjat+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: sjievnnjisvuodama
    sjævnnjat+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Acc: sjievnnjisvuodav
    sjævnnjat+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Ine: sjievnnjisvuodan
    sjævnnjat+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Ill: sjievnnjisvuohtaj
    sjævnnjat+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Ela: sjievnnjisvuodas
    sjævnnjat+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Com: sjievnnjisvuodajn
    sjævnnjat+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Pl+Nom: sjievnnjisvuoda
    sjævnnjat+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Pl+Gen: sjievnnjisvuodaj
    sjævnnjat+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Pl+Acc: sjievnnjisvuodajt
    sjævnnjat+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Pl+Ine: sjievnnjisvuodajn
    sjævnnjat+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Pl+Ill: sjievnnjisvuodajda
    sjævnnjat+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: sjievnnjisvuodajdiseda
    sjævnnjat+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Pl+Ela: sjievnnjisvuodajs
    sjævnnjat+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Pl+Com: sjievnnjisvuodaj
    sjævnnjat+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Ess: sjievnnjisvuohtan
    sjævnnjat+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: []
